Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1046
Forest reserve funds; apportionment; certification to districts.

The county treasurer shall, immediately after making the apportionment under section 79-1044, (1) enter the apportionment in a book kept for that purpose, (2) furnish the secretary of each district in the county a certificate showing the amount due such district, and (3) distribute the funds to each district in the amount due such district for its share of the Forest Reserve Fund.

Laws 1907, c. 143, § 3, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 6940;

C.S.1922, § 6523;

C.S.1929, § 79-2012;

R.S.1943, § 79-2012;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 386, p. 821;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1311;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 692;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 101.